Massachusetts, session 194th, H3917.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, sections 2, 2A 
and 16 of chapter 61B of the General Laws, pertaining to the valuation, assessment and taxation 
of recreational land, as defined in section 1 of said chapter 61B, shall not apply in the town of 
Swampscott’s assessment or taxation of recreational land. 
SECTION 2. Landowners shall not submit and the town of Swampscott board of 
assessors shall not allow applications under sections 3, 5 or 6 of chapter 61B of the General 
Laws for eligibility for taxation at the rate applicable to recreational land. 
SECTION 3. The provisions of sections 1, 4, 7 to 15, inclusive, 17 and 18 of chapter 61B 
of the General Laws, including the provisions pertaining to changes in use, taxation upon 
conveyance, and roll-back taxes, shall continue to apply in full force to land previously assessed 
or taxed as recreational land under said chapter 61B by the town of Swampscott. 

of 2 12  SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.